src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ÁRMMOGIS !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -is, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. As 2 in Spiik. Sg Acc: ármmogisáv, Attr: ármmogis. 
! :is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        :is%>      ATTR          ; ! twol fixes the ss > s
                 +Sg+Nom:is%>      K-CONS        ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:issa%>    PxV           ; !
                        :issa%>    ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! :issa%>Q1 BU/MUS ; !this is wrong:ármmogisáp
                         :%>        ABBO/AMOS     ; !ármmogabbo
       +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:issa%>Q1t K-CONS        ;
               +Cmp/SgGen:issa%>Q1  R             ;
               +Cmp/PlGen:issa%>Q1j R             ;


        +Err/Orth:as%>   ATTR          ; ! !used in Anta Pirak
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:as%>   K-CONS        ; !used in Anta Pirak
        +Err/Orth:assa%> ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN ; ! !used in Anta Pirak


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: bahágis # Even-syllable test
!!€ bahágis:             bahágis+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ bahágisáv:           bahágis+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ bahágis:             bahágis+A+Attr
!!€ bahágabbo:           bahágis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON SÆHKÁLAK !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -álak, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. So far only for "sæhkálak".
! :is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        :ak%>      ATTR          ; !
                 +Sg+Nom:ak%>      K-CONS        ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:agá%>    PxV           ; !
                        :agá%>    ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! :issa%>Q1 BU/MUS ; !this is wrong:ármmogisáp
                         :%>        ABBO/AMOS     ; !sæhkálabbo
               +Cmp/SgGen:lagá%>  R             ;
               +Cmp/PlGen:lagá%>j R             ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: sæhkálak # Even-syllable test
!!€ sæhkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ sähkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ sæhkálagáv:           sæhkálak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ sähkálagáv:           sæhkálak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ sæhkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Attr
!!€ sähkálak:             sæhkálak+A+Attr
!!€ sæhkálabbo:           sæhkálak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
!!€ sähkálabbo:           sæhkálak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON ÅLLAGASJ 
+CmpNP/Last: ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ÅLLAGSJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -asj, attribute same as pred.  No comparatives. 2 in Spiik. Sg Acc: ållagattjav, Attr: ållagasj.
! : VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        :%>     ATTR          ;
                 +Sg+Nom:%>     K-CONS        ;
!        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>    PxV           ; !
                        :a%>    SURGULASJ-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! :a%>Q1 BU/MUS ;
        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1t K-CONS        ;
!               +Cmp/SgNom:%>     R             ; !is only last cmp
!               +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R             ; !is only last cmp
!               +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R             ; !is only last cmp

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: belulasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ belulasj:             belulasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ belulattjav:          belulasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ belulasj:             belulasj+A+Attr

LEXICON DÁRBULASJ 
+CmpNP/Last: DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON DÁRBULASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -asj, attribute same as pred. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: dárbulattjav, Attr: dárbulasj. Essive -attjan, -adtjan is subtaged. Err/Orth also -ahttja.  
! :asj VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +Sg+Nom:asj%>      K-CONS            ;
                        :asj%>      ATTR              ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>j   K-CONS            ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>j   K-CONS            ;
                    +Ess:attja%>n   K-CONS            ;
           +Err/Orth+Ess:adtja%>n   K-CONS            ;
                        :attja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; !This seems right. TO
                        :%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:attja%>t   K-CONS            ;
!               +Cmp/SgNom:asj%>      R                 ;
!               +Cmp/SgGen:attja%>    R                 ;
!               +Cmp/PlGen:attja%>j   R                 ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
                 +Sg+Nom:attja%>    PxV               ; !
        +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:adtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:adtja%>    PxV               ; !


           +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:ahttja%>j   K-CONS            ;
              +Err/Orth+Ess:ahttja%>n   K-CONS            ;
                  +Err/Orth:ahttja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; 
+Err/Orth+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahttja%>t   K-CONS            ;


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: dábálasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ dábálasj:             dábálasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ dábálattjav:          dábálasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ dábálasj:             dábálasj+A+Attr
!!€ dábális:              dábálasj+A+Attr
!!€ dábálabbo:            dábálasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON ASIDASJ
+CmpNP/Last: ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL  ;

LEXICON ASIDASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -asj, -is attr. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: asidattjav, Attr: asidis.
                        :asj        VUOHTA            ;
! :is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        :is%>       ATTR              ; ! Special Attr form
                 +Sg+Nom:asj%>      K-CONS            ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>j   K-CONS            ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>j   K-CONS            ;
                    +Ess:attja%>n   K-CONS            ;
           +Err/Orth+Ess:adtja%>n   K-CONS            ;
                        :attja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; !This seems right. TO
! :attja%> BU/MUS ; !unusual comp. and superl.
                        :%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:attja%>t   K-CONS            ;
!               +Cmp/SgNom:asj%>      R                 ;
!               +Cmp/SgGen:attja%>    R                 ;
!               +Cmp/PlGen:attja%>j   R                 ;
                +Sg+Ill:attja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
                +Sg+Nom:attja%>    PxV               ; !
       +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
       +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:adtja%>    PxV               ; !

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gågulasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ gågulasj:             gågulasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gågulattjav:          gågulasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gågulis:              gågulasj+A+Attr
!!€ gågulabbo:            gågulasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON UDNODIBME !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -dibme, attribute on -is. Odd-syllable comparison. Sg Acc: udnodimev, Attr: udnodis.
! :is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 :is%>      ATTR              ; ! Special Attr form
                 :ibme%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                 :ibme%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                 :ibme%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
                 :%>        ABBO/AMOS         ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ibme%>Q1t K-CONS            ;
        +Cmp/SgGen:ibme%>Q1  R                 ;
        +Cmp/PlGen:ibme%>Q1j R                 ;
!                 :          DUVVAT            ; ! this cant be correct?

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gælvodibme # Even-syllable test
!!€ gælvodibme:            gælvodibme+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gälvodibme:            gælvodibme+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gælvodimev:            gælvodibme+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gälvodimev:            gælvodibme+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gælvodis:              gælvodibme+A+Attr
!!€ gälvodis:              gælvodibme+A+Attr
!!€ gælvodabbo:            gælvodibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
!!€ gälvodabbo:            gælvodibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
